dictsource/el_rules
// Greek -modern
 
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// all words lower case

// Alphabet
// Α α, Β β, Γ γ, Δ δ, Ε ε, Ζ ζ, Η η, Θ θ, Ι ι, Κ κ, Λ λ, Μ μ, Ν ν, Ξ ξ,
// Ο ο, Π π, Ρ ρ, Σ σ ς (word-final form), Τ τ, Υ υ, Φ φ, Χ χ, Ψ ψ, Ω ω.

// Letter group B:   θ κ ξ π ς σ τ φ χ  (voiceless consonants)
// Letter group Y:   ε η ι υ  έ ή ί ύ  (front vowels).

// TODO: Support combining marks/diacritics in the main rules.
// TODO: Properly handle preserved polytonic combining marks (convert to standard combining mark codepoints).

.L01 αι ε ι η υ οι ει  αί έ ί ή ύ οί εί 

.replace
// Map Greek Extended (1fxx) to Greek (03xx) for Polytonic character support (Unicode 8.0):
ἀ	α // U+1f00
ἁ	α // U+1f01
ἂ	ά // U+1f02
ἃ	ά // U+1f03
ἄ	ά // U+1f04
ἅ	ά // U+1f05
ἆ	ά // U+1f06
ἇ	ά // U+1f07

ᾀ	α // U+1F80
ᾁ	α // U+1F81
ᾂ	α // U+1F82
ᾃ	α // U+1F83
ᾄ	α // U+1F84
ᾅ	α // U+1F85
ᾆ	α // U+1F86
ᾇ	α // U+1F87

ἐ	ε // U+1f10
ἑ	ε // U+1f11
ἒ	έ // U+1f12
ἓ	έ // U+1f13
ἔ	έ // U+1f14
ἕ	έ // U+1f15

ἠ	η // U+1f20
ἡ	η // U+1f21
ἢ	ή // U+1f22
ἣ	ή // U+1f23
ἤ	ή // U+1f24
ἥ	ή // U+1f25
ἦ	ή // U+1f26
ἧ	ή // U+1f27

ᾐ	η // U+1F90
ᾑ	η // U+1F91
ᾒ	η // U+1F92
ᾓ	η // U+1F93
ᾔ	η // U+1F94
ᾕ	η // U+1F95
ᾖ	η // U+1F96
ᾗ	η // U+1F97

ἰ	ι // U+1f30
ἱ	ι // U+1f31
ἲ	ί // U+1f32
ἳ	ί // U+1f33
ἴ	ί // U+1f34
ἵ	ί // U+1f35
ἶ	ί // U+1f36
ἷ	ί // U+1f37

ὀ	ο // U+1f40
ὁ	ο // U+1f41
ὂ	ό // U+1f42
ὃ	ό // U+1f43
ὄ	ό // U+1f44
ὅ	ό // U+1f45

ὐ	υ // U+1f50
ὑ	υ // U+1f51
ὒ	ύ // U+1f52
ὓ	ύ // U+1f53
ὔ	ύ // U+1f54
ὕ	ύ // U+1f55
ὖ	ύ // U+1f56
ὗ	ύ // U+1f57

ὠ	ω // U+1f60
ὡ	ω // U+1f61
ὢ	ώ // U+1f62
ὣ	ώ // U+1f63
ὤ	ώ // U+1f64
ὥ	ώ // U+1f65
ὦ	ώ // U+1f66
ὧ	ώ // U+1f67

ὰ	ά // U+1f70
ά	ά // U+1f71
ὲ	έ // U+1f72
έ	έ // U+1f73
ὴ	ή // U+1f74
ή	ή // U+1f75
ὶ	ί // U+1f76
ί	ί // U+1f77
ὸ	ό // U+1f78
ό	ό // U+1f79
ὺ	ύ // U+1f7a
ύ	ύ // U+1f7b
ὼ	ώ // U+1f7c
ώ	ώ // U+1f7d

ᾠ	ω // U+1fa0
ᾡ	ω // U+1fa1
ᾢ	ώ // U+1fa2
ᾣ	ώ // U+1fa3
ᾤ	ώ // U+1fa4
ᾥ	ώ // U+1fa5
ᾦ	ώ // U+1fa6
ᾧ	ώ // U+1fa7

ᾰ	α // U+1fb0
ᾱ	α // U+1fb1
ᾲ	ά // U+1fb2
ᾳ	α // U+1fb3
ᾴ	ά // U+1fb4
ᾶ	ά // U+1fb6
ᾷ	ά // U+1fb7

῁	 ̈ // U+1fc1
ῂ	ή // U+1fc2
ῃ	η // U+1fc3
ῄ	ή // U+1fc4
ῆ	ή // U+1fc6
ῇ	ή // U+1fc7
῍	´ // U+1fcd
῎	´ // U+1fce

ῐ	ι // U+1fd0
ῑ	ι // U+1fd1
ῒ	ΐ // U+1fd2
ΐ	ΐ // U+1fd3
ῖ	ί // U+1fd6
ῗ	ΐ // U+1fd7
῝	´ // U+1fdd
῞	´ // U+1fde

ῠ	υ // U+1fe0
ῡ	υ // U+1fe1
ῢ	ΰ // U+1fe2
ΰ	ΰ // U+1fe3
ῤ	ρ // U+1fe4
ῥ	ρ // U+1fe5
ῦ	ύ // U+1fe6
ῧ	ΰ // U+1fe7
῭	΅ // U+1fed
`	´ // U+1fef

ῲ	ώ // U+1ff2
ῳ	ω // U+1ff3
ῴ	ώ // U+1ff4
ῶ	ώ // U+1ff6
ῷ	ώ // U+1ff7

// replace variant letter forms with their standard equivalents
ϐ	β    // U+03d0
ϑ	θ    // U+03d1
ϒ	υ    // U+03d2
ϕ	φ    // U+03d5
ϖ	π    // U+03d6
ϰ	κ    // U+03f0
ϱ	ρ    // U+03f1
ϲ	ς    // U+03f2
ϴ	θ    // U+03f4
ϵ	ε    // U+03f5
Ϲ	ς    // U+03f9

.group α
           α        a
           αι       e
           αί       'e
           αυ       av
           αυ (B    af      // +voiceless consonant κ, π, τ, χ, θ, σ, ξ.
           αύ      'av
           αύ (B   'af      // +voiceless consonant κ, π, τ, χ, θ, σ, ξ.
           αη       aI
           αϊ       aI

.group β
           β        v
           β (β

.group γ
           γ        Q
           γγ       g
           γκ       g
        A) γγ       Ng
        A) γκ       Ng
           γ (χ     N
           γ (L01   j
           γαι (A   j
           γε (A    j
           γι (A    j
           γη (A    j
           γυ (A    j
           γοι (A   j
           γει (A   j

.group δ
           δ        D
           δ (δ


.group ε
           ε        e
           ει       i
           εί       'i
        C) ει (A    C
           ευ       ev
           ευ (B    ef      // +voiceless consonant
           ευ (β    e
           ευ (φ    e
           εύ      'ev
           εύ (B   'ef      // +voiceless consonant
           εύ (β   'e
           εύ (φ   'e

.group ζ
           ζ        z
           ζ (ζ
           ζη (A    zj
           ζι (A    zj
           ζυ (A    zj
           ζει (A   zj
           ζοι (A   zj

.group η
           η        i
//        C) η (A     ;
           ηυ       iv
           ηυ (B    if      // +voiceless consonant

.group θ
           θ        T
           θ (θ

.group ι
           ι        i
	τ) ι (Α     C
        π) ι (A     C
	τ) ι (Α     C
        κ) ι (Α     C
	ρ) ι (A     i
        δ) ι (α_    j
           ι (ε     i

.group κ
           κ        k
           κ (κ
       ν_) κ        g

           κ (Y     c
           κ (αι    c
           κ (αί    c
           κ (οι    c
           κ (οί    c

           κη (A    c  // k + i sound = [c]
           κι (A    c
           κυ (A    c
           κει (A   c
           κοι (A   c


.group λ
           λ        l
           λ (λ
           λη (A    l^
           λι (A    l^
           λυ (A    l^
           λει (A   l^
           λοι (A   l^

.group μ
           μ        m
        A) μ (μ
           μ (π     

.group μπ
	  μπ	b

.group ν
           ν        n
           ν (ν
           ντ       d  // always? or not after a vowel?
           ν (_π    m
           ν (_ψ    m
           ν (_κ    N
           ν (_και_  n  // there is a pause before και
           ν (_ξ    N

           νη (A    n^
           νι (A    n^
           νυ (A    n^
           νει (A   n^
           νοι (A   n^


.group ξ
           ξ        ks
           ξ (ξ
       ν_) ξ        gz

.group ο
           ο        o
           οι       i
           οί       'i
 //       C) οι (A    ;
           ου       u
           ού       'u
           οη       oI
           οϊ       oI

.group π
           π        p
           π (π
       ν_) π        b
        μ) π	    b

.group ρ
           ρ        r
           ρρ       r
        A) ρ (A     r
        C) ρ        r

       αυ) ρ        r   // υ  becomes consionant [v]
       αύ) ρ        r
       ευ) ρ        r
       εύ) ρ        r
       ηυ) ρ        r
       ηύ) ρ        r


.group σ
           σ        s
// ??          σ (σ
           ση (A    sj
           σι (A    sj
           συ (A    sj
           σει (A   sj
           σοι (A   sj

.group ς
           ς        s
           ς (_B    s    // +voiceless consonant
           ς (_C    z

.group τ
           τ        t
           τ (τ
           τσ       ts
           τζ       dz
       ν_) τ        d
       ν_) τσ       dz

.group υ
           υ        i
//        C) υ (A     ;
           υι       i
           υί       'i

.group φ
           φ        f
           φ (φ

.group χ
           χ        x
           χ (Y     C
           χ (αι    C
           χ (αί    C
           χ (οι    C
           χ (οί    C

           χει (A   C
           χη (A    C
           χι (A    C
           χοι (A   C
           χυ (A    C

.group ψ
           ψ        ps
           ψ (ψ
       ν_) ψ        bz

.group ω
           ω        o



.group
           ά        'a
           άη       'aI
           άι       'aI
           έ        'e
           ή        'i
           ί        'i
           ΐ        'i   // dialytika + tonos
           ϊ        i
           ϋ        i
           ό        'o
           όη       'oI
           όι       'oI
           ύ        'i
           ΰ        'i   // dialytika + tonos
           ώ        'o

            ̓            // U+1fbd
           ι            // U+1fbe
            ̓            // U+1fbf

             ͂           // U+1fc0
           ῏            // U+1fcf

           ῟            // U+1fdf

            ̔            // U+1ffe

           ͅ		// combining ypogegrammeni
           
           .        tel'ia
           , (D     k'oma
           !        Tavmastik'o
        !) !
